Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1622.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 4.1, to read: ARTICLE 4.1. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH TECHNICIANS START_STATUTE36-444. Definition of behavioral health technician In this article, unless the context otherwise requires, "behavioral health technician": 1. Means an individual to whom all of the following apply: (a) Is employed by a behavioral health facility that is a licensed health care institution pursuant to this chapter. (b) Provides behavioral health services under the supervision and clinical oversight of a licensed behavioral health professional. (c) Performs only delegated clinical and supportive functions consistent with the individual's demonstrated training and competence and the employing behavioral health facility's policies and procedures. 2. Includes a registered nurse who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15, who is acting within the registered nurse's scope of practice and who performs the functions of a behavioral health technician. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-444.01. Qualifications; standards A. A behavioral health technician shall: 1. Be at least eighteen years of age. 2. Possess a minimum of a high school diploma or the equivalent. 3. Successfully complete any required background checks. B. Before providing supervised direct services, a behavioral health technician shall complete training that addresses: 1. Behavioral health system orientation. 2. Confidentiality and compliance. 3. Professional boundaries and ethics. 4. Crisis response and de-escalation techniques and skills. 5. Trauma-informed and recovery-oriented care. C. A behavioral health facility may adopt internal standards for behavioral health technicians that exceed statutory minimums. The employing behavioral health facility shall provide ongoing training that the behavioral health facility requires or that is required by law. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE36-444.02. Duties A. A behavioral health technician may provide services consistent with the individual's training, delegation and supervision, including: 1. Implementing client treatment, service or recovery plans. 2. Providing skills training and supportive counseling to support behavioral, emotional and recovery-oriented functioning of clients. 3. Assisting with client self-administration of medication as authorized by law or within an applicable scope of practice. 4. Completing documentation and clerical activities related to client care. 5. Contributing to client assessments and service planning, including: (a) Interviewing and recording client history, current status and desired goals. (b) Gathering and recording collateral and supportive documentation to assist in developing the service plan. (c) Recording strengths, needs, abilities and preferences into a service plan. 6. Providing education regarding treatment options and community resources. 7. Submitting allowable billing consistent with payer requirements. 8. Supporting mobile crisis teams and their interventions, including engagement, de-escalation, safety planning, follow-up coordination, collection of collateral information and assistance with assessment activities. 9. Providing client transportation, meal preparation and daily living supports consistent with treatment goals. 10. Scheduling client appointments and providing case management support activities. 11. Monitoring and documenting vital signs of clients and other health indicators for which the behavioral health technician has received appropriate training and authorization. 12. Other supportive or rehabilitative services consistent with the individual's training and supervision and the employing behavioral health facility's license. B. This section does not authorize any behavioral health technician to diagnose medical or behavioral health conditions, prescribe medications or provide services beyond those delegated to the behavioral health technician and supervised by a licensed behavioral health professional. END_STATUTE